Hawaii statutes.
[§127A-25] Rules and orders. (a) For
the purpose of carrying out any provision of this chapter, the governor may
adopt rules for the State and the mayor may adopt rules for the county which
may, if so stated in the rules, have the force and effect of law. Even though
the rules are prescribed pursuant to a power conferred, or having mandatory or
prohibitive effect, only in the event of a state of emergency or local state of
emergency, the rules nevertheless may be prescribed prior thereto if stated
therein to have the force and effect of law only in the event of a state of
emergency or local state of emergency. All the rules, and likewise all other
action taken under this chapter, shall be made and taken with due consideration
of the orders, rules, regulations, actions, recommendations, and requests of
federal authorities relevant thereto. In these rules, reasonable
classifications, exceptions, and exemptions may be made and granted. Such
rules shall not be subject to chapter 91.

(b) The power to adopt rules having the force
and effect of law shall not be deemed in derogation of the power of the
governor, or the governor's duly authorized representatives, or the mayor, or
the mayor's duly authorized representatives, to make orders for the enforcement
of this chapter or the rules issued thereunder. The rules may provide for the
making of administrative findings by duly authorized representatives, or for
the application of the rules by such representatives as the circumstances may
require, and the issuance of orders therefor.

(c) Rules adopted pursuant to this chapter
during a state of emergency shall be promulgated as herein provided, and may be
made effective upon the promulgation. The rules shall be promulgated by
posting them on the applicable state or county government website and by
publishing them in a newspaper of general circulation in the State, by means calculated to bring its contents to the
attention of the general public, including by official
announcement by means of television or radio broadcast, or both, or by Internet,
or, where only known persons are concerned, by service upon these persons by
registered or certified mail or by personal service. The rules shall remain
posted on the government website while in effect. When immediate promulgation
of the rules is necessary in the opinion of the governor or mayor, as
applicable, who shall be the sole judge thereof, in lieu of publication, the
rules may be promulgated by television or radio broadcast, or both, or by Internet,
or such other means as may be available; provided that the rules shall be
posted and published thereafter at the earliest practicable date. [L 2014, c
111, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next